engine/dictionaries/si_LK/si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2157 Y 1
SFX 2157 0 ්මෙන් .
SFX 1306 Y 1
SFX 1306 0 වටම .
SFX 1980 Y 1
SFX 1980 0 වටය .
SFX 602 Y 1
SFX 602 0 වොත් .
SFX 2910 Y 1
SFX 2910 0 ායුෂ .
SFX 3463 Y 1
SFX 3463 0 ඇල්ල .
SFX 3099 Y 1
SFX 3099 0 වකගේ .
SFX 1353 Y 1
SFX 1353 0 තක .
SFX 3165 Y 1
SFX 3165 0 යුම් .
SFX 544 Y 1
SFX 544 0 තට .
SFX 136 Y 1
SFX 136 0 මින් .
SFX 2093 Y 1
SFX 2093 0 තද .
SFX 1761 Y 1
SFX 1761 0 තන .
SFX 664 Y 1
SFX 664 0 මිනි .
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 0 තම .
SFX 613 Y 1
SFX 613 0 තය .
SFX 523 Y 1
SFX 523 0 තර .
SFX 803 Y 1
SFX 803 0 තල .
SFX 4035 Y 1
SFX 4035 0 ාණි .
SFX 4034 Y 1
SFX 4034 0 ාණු .
SFX 310 Y 1
SFX 310 0 භාවය .
SFX 4858 Y 1
SFX 4858 0 තව .
SFX 5 Y 1
SFX 5 0 ත් .
SFX 138 Y 1
SFX 138 0 තා .
SFX 211 Y 1
SFX 211 0 ති .
SFX 1350 Y 1
SFX 1350 0 තී .
SFX 431 Y 1
SFX 431 0 තු .
SFX 1200 Y 1
SFX 1200 0 නයක .
SFX 858 Y 1
SFX 858 0 තෙ .
SFX 311 Y 1
SFX 311 0 තේ .
SFX 1755 Y 1
SFX 1755 0 තෝ .
SFX 4244 Y 1
SFX 4244 0 විටක .
SFX 456 Y 1
SFX 456 0 නයට .
SFX 4938 Y 1
SFX 4938 0 ග්ස් .
SFX 3035 Y 1
SFX 3035 0 විටම .
SFX 3441 Y 1
SFX 3441 0 කරුවෙකුට .
SFX 708 Y 1
SFX 708 0 නයි .
SFX 507 Y 1
SFX 507 0 නයේ .
SFX 2991 Y 1
SFX 2991 0 සාමි .
SFX 2605 Y 1
SFX 2605 0 ගැන්වීම .
SFX 340 Y 1
SFX 340 0 මකට .
SFX 2127 Y 1
SFX 2127 0 කුයි .
SFX 4516 Y 1
SFX 4516 0 ‍යතාව .
SFX 1909 Y 1
SFX 1909 0 ාවන්ගෙන් .
SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 0 මක් .
SFX 428 Y 1
SFX 428 0 මකි .
SFX 2793 Y 1
SFX 2793 0 ිවීමත් .
SFX 2219 Y 1
SFX 2219 0 ුගෙන් .
SFX 4688 Y 1
SFX 4688 0 න්නෙක් .
SFX 2118 Y 1
SFX 2118 0 ගමනය .
SFX 3497 Y 1
SFX 3497 0 ්‍රයේ .
SFX 3373 Y 1
SFX 3373 0 ණයෙහි .
SFX 320 Y 1
SFX 320 0 වෙහි .
SFX 4768 Y 1
SFX 4768 0 දේශයෙන් .
SFX 3469 Y 1
SFX 3469 0 ්වෙනි .
SFX 4583 Y 1
SFX 4583 0 මනක් .
SFX 2407 Y 1
SFX 2407 0 ලියක .
SFX 1076 Y 1
SFX 1076 0 ලියට .
SFX 2633 Y 1
SFX 2633 0 කාරයට .
SFX 1242 Y 1
SFX 1242 0 ේවා .
SFX 1022 Y 1
SFX 1022 0 ේවි .
SFX 2508 Y 1
SFX 2508 0 න්නම් .
SFX 2102 Y 1
SFX 2102 0 ටිය .
SFX 440 Y 1
SFX 440 0 වරයාගේ .
SFX 4377 Y 1
SFX 4377 0 ලියා .
SFX 2170 Y 1
SFX 2170 0 ්ටර් .
SFX 1311 Y 1
SFX 1311 0 ලියේ .
SFX 3166 Y 1
SFX 3166 0 යුමක් .
SFX 866 Y 1
SFX 866 0 කාරයා .
SFX 1804 Y 1
SFX 1804 0 ්නාගේ .
SFX 2629 Y 1
SFX 2629 0 කාරයේ .
SFX 3432 Y 1
SFX 3432 0 කාරයො .
SFX 1117 Y 1
SFX 1117 0 කාරයෝ .
SFX 930 Y 1
SFX 930 0 කටවත් .
SFX 339 Y 1
SFX 339 0 යකුට .
SFX 2450 Y 1
SFX 2450 0 යකුද .
SFX 3080 Y 1
SFX 3080 0 වන්නන්ට .
SFX 4521 Y 1
SFX 4521 0 යකුව .
SFX 1289 Y 1
SFX 1289 0 ස්ථානය .
SFX 2087 Y 1
SFX 2087 0 තාවත් .
SFX 4075 Y 1
SFX 4075 0 හීමට .
SFX 4658 Y 1
SFX 4658 0 පත්හි .
SFX 4770 Y 1
SFX 4770 0 දෙයක් .
SFX 2120 Y 1
SFX 2120 0 ගමගේ .
SFX 3594 Y 1
SFX 3594 0 ේදීන් .
SFX 4643 Y 1
SFX 4643 0 පාණන් .
SFX 4549 Y 1
SFX 4549 0 මීටර් .
SFX 2167 Y 1
SFX 2167 0 ්තක .
SFX 2683 Y 1
SFX 2683 0 ්තට .
SFX 2166 Y 1
SFX 2166 0 ්තම .
SFX 1234 Y 1
SFX 1234 0 ්තය .
SFX 3542 Y 1
SFX 3542 0 ්තර .
SFX 2682 Y 1
SFX 2682 0 ්තල .
SFX 4723 Y 1
SFX 4723 0 නුම් .
SFX 1709 Y 1
SFX 1709 0 යකුගෙන් .
SFX 4485 Y 1
SFX 4485 0 යායි .
SFX 1702 Y 1
SFX 1702 0 යේදීද .
SFX 850 Y 1
SFX 850 0 යේදීම .
SFX 740 Y 1
SFX 740 0 යේදීය .
SFX 677 Y 1
SFX 677 0 ්තා .
SFX 1233 Y 1
SFX 1233 0 ්ති .
SFX 1574 Y 1
SFX 1574 0 ්තු .
SFX 2509 Y 1
SFX 2509 0 න්ද්‍ර .
SFX 1808 Y 1
SFX 1808 0 ්තෙ .
SFX 447 Y 1
SFX 447 0 ්තේ .
SFX 2680 Y 1
SFX 2680 0 ්තෝ .
SFX 3149 Y 1
SFX 3149 0 රාජයා .
SFX 3771 Y 1
SFX 3771 0 ිවෙලා .
SFX 3569 Y 1
SFX 3569 0 ෝගයෙන් .
SFX 3566 Y 1
SFX 3566 0 ෝත්සවය .
SFX 2302 Y 1
SFX 2302 0 ාන්තයක් .
SFX 4208 Y 1
SFX 4208 0 වෙන්ඩ .
SFX 2350 Y 1
SFX 2350 0 වෙන්ද .
SFX 499 Y 1
SFX 499 0 වෙන්න .
SFX 840 Y 1
SFX 840 0 වෙන්ම .
SFX 3513 Y 1
SFX 3513 0 ්පයක් .
SFX 4050 Y 1
SFX 4050 0 ාගමන .
SFX 881 Y 1
SFX 881 0 ීන්ට .
SFX 811 Y 1
SFX 811 0 කන් .
SFX 3440 Y 1
SFX 3440 0 කර්මය .
SFX 3736 Y 1
SFX 3736 0 ීයත්වයක් .
SFX 559 Y 1
SFX 559 0 ියකට .
SFX 1423 Y 1
SFX 1423 0 ාදීන් .
SFX 1453 Y 1
SFX 1453 0 වීමකට .
SFX 176 Y 1
SFX 176 0 ියක් .
SFX 558 Y 1
SFX 558 0 ියකි .
SFX 726 Y 1
SFX 726 0 ියකු .
SFX 264 Y 1
SFX 264 0 වීමක් .
SFX 4620 Y 1
SFX 4620 0 පෝට් .
SFX 235 Y 1
SFX 235 0 කාර .
SFX 1060 Y 1
SFX 1060 0 වීමකි .
SFX 1365 Y 1
SFX 1365 0 කාව .
SFX 1474 Y 1
SFX 1474 0 ලීමෙන් .
SFX 3762 Y 1
SFX 3762 0 ිහාමි .
SFX 1555 Y 1
SFX 1555 0 කන්ද .
SFX 3452 Y 1
SFX 3452 0 කන්න .
SFX 3177 Y 1
SFX 3177 0 යයෙන් .
SFX 1678 Y 1
SFX 1678 0 වනතුරු .
SFX 3310 Y 1
SFX 3310 0 ධිය .
SFX 606 Y 1
SFX 606 0 වනට .
SFX 4332 Y 1
SFX 4332 0 වනම .
SFX 3352 Y 1
SFX 3352 0 තුමන්ගේ .
SFX 1128 Y 1
SFX 1128 0 ්වන්නට .
SFX 1511 Y 1
SFX 1511 0 දෙනෙක් .
SFX 2067 Y 1
SFX 2067 0 දෙනෙකු .
SFX 2268 Y 1
SFX 2268 0 ිකයකු .
SFX 66 Y 1
SFX 66 0 වන් .
SFX 4327 Y 1
SFX 4327 0 වනි .
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 0 වනු .
SFX 1305 Y 1
SFX 1305 0 වනේ .
SFX 1107 Y 1
SFX 1107 0 තත් .
SFX 1016 Y 1
SFX 1016 0 ්වන්නේ .
SFX 2462 Y 1
SFX 2462 0 මහල් .
SFX 3746 Y 1
SFX 3746 0 ීමටවත් .
SFX 4249 Y 1
SFX 4249 0 වැසියන්ගෙන් .
SFX 2474 Y 1
SFX 2474 0 භව .
SFX 3647 Y 1
SFX 3647 0 ූපී .
SFX 253 Y 1
SFX 253 0 වාට .
SFX 323 Y 1
SFX 323 0 වාද .
SFX 3046 Y 1
SFX 3046 0 වාන .
SFX 4598 Y 1
SFX 4598 0 භා .
SFX 1459 Y 1
SFX 1459 0 වාම .
SFX 534 Y 1
SFX 534 0 වාය .
SFX 3044 Y 1
SFX 3044 0 වාර .
SFX 1918 Y 1
SFX 1918 0 ාදිය .
SFX 4871 Y 1
SFX 4871 0 තමින් .
SFX 1962 Y 1
SFX 1962 0 වාස .
SFX 2569 Y 1
SFX 2569 0 තාක් .
SFX 1457 Y 1
SFX 1457 0 වින් .
SFX 490 Y 1
SFX 490 0 නායක .
SFX 1525 Y 1
SFX 1525 0 තියක් .
SFX 4316 Y 1
SFX 4316 0 වන්නෙත් .
SFX 3538 Y 1
SFX 3538 0 ්තිය .
SFX 820 Y 1
SFX 820 0 ූවන් .
SFX 4808 Y 1
SFX 4808 0 දයෙන් .
SFX 825 Y 1
SFX 825 0 ීත් .
SFX 3217 Y 1
SFX 3217 0 මත්ම .
SFX 4842 Y 1
SFX 4842 0 තීන් .
SFX 2027 Y 1
SFX 2027 0 මත්ව .
SFX 3103 Y 1
SFX 3103 0 ල්ලත් .
SFX 2747 Y 1
SFX 2747 0 ුල්ලා .
SFX 3645 Y 1
SFX 3645 0 ූවාට .
SFX 3671 Y 1
SFX 3671 0 ුල්ලේ .
SFX 1458 Y 1
SFX 1458 0 වැන්න .
SFX 1280 Y 1
SFX 1280 0 ාරාම .
SFX 2001 Y 1
SFX 2001 0 රුණු .
SFX 4419 Y 1
SFX 4419 0 රුණේ .
SFX 729 Y 1
SFX 729 0 සේකර .
SFX 3981 Y 1
SFX 3981 0 ාරාමයට .
SFX 649 Y 1
SFX 649 0 කදීම .
SFX 1790 Y 1
SFX 1790 0 කදීය .
SFX 361 Y 1
SFX 361 0 කරුවකු .
SFX 3431 Y 1
SFX 3431 0 කාරයොත් .
SFX 1641 Y 1
SFX 1641 0 ාරාමයේ .
SFX 2638 Y 1
SFX 2638 0 කරුවකුගේ .
SFX 4159 Y 1
SFX 4159 0 සිටින .
SFX 1134 Y 1
SFX 1134 0 ෙකුගේ .
SFX 4955 Y 1
SFX 4955 0 ගැට .
SFX 3180 Y 1
SFX 3180 0 යයට .
SFX 3394 Y 1
SFX 3394 0 ගැන .
SFX 2410 Y 1
SFX 2410 0 ලවල .
SFX 2953 Y 1
SFX 2953 0 ළක් .
SFX 4617 Y 1
SFX 4617 0 ප්‍රාප්තිය .
SFX 1026 Y 1
SFX 1026 0 ුල් .
SFX 71 Y 1
SFX 71 0 යයි .
SFX 3674 Y 1
SFX 3674 0 ුලු .
SFX 1324 Y 1
SFX 1324 0 යයේ .
SFX 846 Y 1
SFX 846 0 ලාල් .
SFX 3948 Y 1
SFX 3948 0 ාසන්න .
SFX 4374 Y 1
SFX 4374 0 ලීමක් .
SFX 4254 Y 1
SFX 4254 0 වැයි .
SFX 1146 Y 1
SFX 1146 0 ින්වත් .
SFX 1492 Y 1
SFX 1492 0 බත් .
SFX 4177 Y 1
SFX 4177 0 සම් .
SFX 4144 Y 1
SFX 4144 0 සුණි .
SFX 3349 Y 1
SFX 3349 0 තුවට .
SFX 2337 Y 1
SFX 2337 0 සුණු .
SFX 4143 Y 1
SFX 4143 0 සුණේ .
SFX 4578 Y 1
SFX 4578 0 මයකට .
SFX 2174 Y 1
SFX 2174 0 ්කම් .
SFX 2563 Y 1
SFX 2563 0 තුවේ .
SFX 3678 Y 1
SFX 3678 0 ුරෙන් .
SFX 1094 Y 1
SFX 1094 0 මයක් .
SFX 3215 Y 1
SFX 3215 0 මයකි .
SFX 2478 Y 1
SFX 2478 0 බැද්ද .
SFX 2155 Y 1
SFX 2155 0 ්‍යයකට .
SFX 1376 Y 1
SFX 1376 0 ්‍යයක් .
SFX 3502 Y 1
SFX 3502 0 ්‍යයකි .
SFX 3190 Y 1
SFX 3190 0 ම්බර .
SFX 4437 Y 1
SFX 4437 0 රයාගෙන් .
SFX 761 Y 1
SFX 761 0 කරණ .
SFX 246 Y 1
SFX 246 0 කරන .
SFX 2138 Y 1
SFX 2138 0 කරය .
SFX 4530 Y 1
SFX 4530 0 ම්බා .
SFX 1369 Y 1
SFX 1369 0 කරල .
SFX 4528 Y 1
SFX 4528 0 ම්බි .
SFX 1081 Y 1
SFX 1081 0 රණය .
SFX 2804 Y 1
SFX 2804 0 ියෙමු .
SFX 261 Y 1
SFX 261 0 කරු .
SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188 0 දැයි .
SFX 2304 Y 1
SFX 2304 0 ානයක් .
SFX 392 Y 1
SFX 392 0 කගේ .
SFX 4011 Y 1
SFX 4011 0 ානයකි .
SFX 2324 Y 1
SFX 2324 0 ස්සා .
SFX 2615 Y 1
SFX 2615 0 කෙන .
SFX 1274 Y 1
SFX 1274 0 ිකයා .
SFX 2857 Y 1
SFX 2857 0 ිකයි .
SFX 1152 Y 1
SFX 1152 0 ිකයෝ .
SFX 2543 Y 1
SFX 2543 0 දුන්නේ .
SFX 826 Y 1
SFX 826 0 ිවලින් .
SFX 3911 Y 1
SFX 3911 0 ැසින් .
SFX 3870 Y 1
SFX 3870 0 ිටම .
SFX 3869 Y 1
SFX 3869 0 ිටි .
SFX 3069 Y 1
SFX 3069 0 වරක .
SFX 1303 Y 1
SFX 1303 0 වයකට .
SFX 1302 Y 1
SFX 1302 0 වරට .
SFX 2387 Y 1
SFX 2387 0 වරණ .
SFX 2148 Y 1
SFX 2148 0 ්වූහ .
SFX 2384 Y 1
SFX 2384 0 වරය .
SFX 966 Y 1
SFX 966 0 ස්ථාන .
